Illinois, session 104th, SB2733.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 5Section 3.8 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/3.8 new)7    Sec. 3.8. Licensed day care centers; immigration 8enforcement. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Civil immigration warrant" means any document that is not 11approved or ordered by a judge that can form the basis for an 12individual's arrest or detention for a civil immigration 13enforcement purpose. "Civil immigration warrant" includes Form 14I-200 "Warrant for the Arrest of Alien", Form I-203 "Order to 15Detain or Release Alien", Form I-205 "Warrant of 16Removal/Deportation", Form I-286 "Notice of Custody 17Determination", any predecessor or successor form, and all 18warrants, hits, or requests contained in the "Immigration 19Violator File" of the FBI's National Crime Information Center 20(NCIC) database. "Civil immigration warrant" does not include 21any criminal warrant.22    "Immigration enforcement action" includes any arrests or 23detentions conducted by agents or officers of the United   SB2733- 2 -LRB104 16073 AAS 29354 b1States Department of Homeland Security, United States 2Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or United States Customs 3and Border Protection or any other individual or entity with 4the power to arrest or detain individuals or manage custody of 5detained individuals for the purposes of civil immigration 6enforcement.7    "Law enforcement agent" means an agent of federal, State, 8or local law enforcement authorized with the power to arrest 9or detain individuals or manage the custody of detained 10individuals for a law enforcement purpose, including civil 11immigration enforcement.12    (b) A licensed day care center shall not disclose or 13threaten to disclose to any other person, entity, or agency 14information regarding or relating to the actual or perceived 15citizenship or immigration status of a child or an associated 16person, unless disclosure is required by State or federal law.17    (c) A licensed day care center shall not consent to entry 18to its premises by a law enforcement agent for immigration 19enforcement action unless the law enforcement agent provides 20valid identification and a signed judicial warrant or order or 21subpoena to enter the facility. The day care center director 22or the day care center director's designee shall request to 23review the judicial warrant or order or subpoena to ensure its 24validity before allowing entry. A licensed day care center 25shall not consent to entry to its premises by a law enforcement 26agent who provides no supporting documentation for entry or   SB2733- 3 -LRB104 16073 AAS 29354 b1presents only a civil immigration warrant. This subsection 2does not prohibit licensed day care centers from consenting to 3a law enforcement agent's entry to its premises for the 4purposes of hotline emergency calls or incidents arising out 5of mandated reporting.6    (d) This Section does not affect a licensed day care 7center's obligation as a mandated reporter or to otherwise 8respond to instances of suspected crime on the premises. 9    (e) The Department of Children and Family Services or the 10Department of Early Childhood, as is applicable, shall make 11available on its website resources for families, including, 12but not limited to, resources regarding the constitutional 13rights of families, family preparedness plans, and a copy of 14the Department of Children and Family Services' appointment of 15short-term guardian form (Form CFS 444-2 or its predecessor or 16successor form).17    (f) If a child's parent or guardian directly faces 18immigration enforcement action, a licensed day care center 19shall use the child's emergency contact information and 20release the child to the persons designated as the child's 21emergency contacts or into the custody of an individual who 22presents a properly executed appointment of short-term 23guardian form on behalf of the child.24    (g) A licensed day care center shall adopt policies by 25January 1, 2026 to comply with this Section and shall ensure 26that all staff members are trained on the adopted policies.   SB2733- 4 -LRB104 16073 AAS 29354 b1The policies shall require the following:2        (1) procedures for notifying and seeking written 3    consent from a child's parents or guardian if a law 4    enforcement agent requests access to personally 5    identifiable information from the child's records, unless 6    such access is in compliance with a judicial warrant or 7    order or a subpoena that restricts the disclosure of the 8    information to the child's parents or guardian;9        (2) families enrolled at the licensed day care center 10    to update their emergency contact list biannually; and11        (3) notification to be given, within a reasonable time 12    period, to parents or guardians and the Department if 13    immigration enforcement action occurs at the licensed day 14    care center or its environs.15    A licensed day care center's late pick-up policy shall be 16updated to include the degree of diligence the licensed day 17care center will use to reach a child's emergency contacts, 18including the number of attempted phone calls to parents and 19emergency contacts and any requests for police assistance in 20finding a child's emergency contact. 21    (h) Failure to comply with subsection (b) of this Section 22shall result in a formal licensing violation. Failure to 23comply with any other provision of this Section may result in a 24licensing violation. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.